Oklahoma, session 2026, SB606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 138.1a, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 138.1a. A. In each county of this state possessing a


population of over three hundred thousand (300,000) four hundred


thousand (400,000) according to the latest Federal Decennial Census


of 1990, or any succeeding Federal Decennial Census, there is hereby


created the office of public defender, and such office shall be


charged upon the order of any judge of a court of record of such


county, with the protection of the rights of any defendant to a


criminal action. The board of county commissioners of such county


shall provide for necessary office supplies and equipment and


arrange for sufficient office space in the county building, used by

Req. No. 1143 Page 1


the courts of record of such county, to permit the efficient and


effective operation of the office of public defender.


B. Subject to available funding, the board of county


commissioners, along with the office of the public defender, shall


provide and coordinate training and continuing legal education for


attorneys employed by the office of the public defender. Curriculum


for training required under this section shall include, but not be


limited to:


1. Nationally recognized defense seminars; and


2. Evidence-based practices regarding behavioral health and


treatment of defendants with substance abuse or mental health needs.


C. For purposes of liability under the Governmental Tort Claims


Act, any public defender, assistant public defender or employee


thereof, who is employed under this section shall be deemed a state


employee.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 138.4, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 138.4. In counties subject to the provisions of Section


138.1a et seq. of this title, wherein the district judges have


determined, in accordance with Section 138.3 of this title that the


protection of the unfortunate and poverty-stricken defendants


subject to criminal action in such county require the employment of


a county indigent defender on a full-time basis, such person so


appointed shall not engage in any practice of law except in the

Req. No. 1143 Page 2


performance of the duties as county indigent defender, and shall


receive a salary commensurate with the salary received by the


district attorney in said the district, payable monthly, from the


court fund of such the county, provided such salaries shall not


apply to counties with a population of less than three hundred


thousand (300,000) population four hundred thousand (400,000)


according to the latest Federal Decennial Census; provided that if


additional assistance is required by the county indigent defender to


properly fulfill the duties of the office, the indigent defender may


authorize the employment of and appoint assistant defenders on a


full-time or part-time basis, which assistants shall be under the


same restrictions as to the practice of law as the county indigent


defender of such county, and each shall receive a salary


commensurate with the range of salaries of assistant district


attorneys in their districts, payable monthly, out of the court fund


of the county as determined by the county indigent defender.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 138.9, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 138.9. In those counties with a population in excess of


three hundred thousand (300,000) under four hundred thousand


(400,000) according to the latest Federal Decennial Census, the


county indigent defenders, for those counties subject to the


provisions of Section 138.1a of this title, shall perfect appeals


for those defendants which they represented in the trial court

Req. No. 1143 Page 3


unless an appellate conflict exists between two or more such


defendants, in which case the county indigent defender shall


represent one defendant, the Oklahoma Indigent Defense System shall


represent one defendant, and the court may assign the appeal of the


case for any other defendants in the same manner as provided for


conflict at the trial level in Section 138.7 of this title. If an


appellate conflict of interest exists between the defendant and the


county indigent defender in a case in which the defendant has


received the death penalty, the district court may appoint the


Indigent Defense System to represent the defendant on appeal. The


Oklahoma Indigent Defense System shall also represent all indigent


defendants from such counties who were not represented at trial by


the county public defenders unless a conflict of interest on appeal


exists between defendants, in which case the Oklahoma Indigent


Defense System shall represent one defendant, the county indigent


defender shall represent one defendant and the court may assign the


appeal of the case for any other defendants in the same manner as


provided for conflict at the trial level in Section 138.7 of this


title.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1143 TEK 1/19/2025 5:39:53 AM





Req. No. 1143 Page 4